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DI3OX-01

DTC PO 110/24ntake Air Temp. Circuit Malfunction

(fig. 1)
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The intake air temp. sensor is built into the air flow meter and
senses the intake air temperature.

A thermistor built in the sensor changes the resistance value
according to the intake air temperature.

The lower the intake air temperature, the greater the thermistor
resistance value, and the higher the intake air temperature, the
lower the thermistor resistance value (See fig. 1).

Theintake airtemp. sensoris connected to the engine ECU

(See below). The 5 V power source voltage in the engine ECU
is applied to the intake air temp. sensor from the terminal THA
via resistor R.

That is, the resistor R and the intake air temp. sensor are con-
nected in series. When the resistance value of the intake air
temp. sensor changes in accordance with changes in the intake
air temperature, the potential at terminal THA also changes.
Based on this signal, the engine ECU increases the fuel injec-
tion volume to improve driveability during cold engine opera-
tion.

DTC No.

DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0110/24 Openorshortinintake airtemp. sensor circuit

* Openorshortinintake airtemp. sensor circuit
« Intake airtemp. sensor (inside air flow meter)

*EngineECU
HINT:
Afterconfirming DTC P0O110/24usethehand  —heldtesterto confirmtheintake airtemperature from CUR-
RENT DATA.
Temperature Displayed Malfunction
-40°C (-40°F) Open circuit

140°C (284 °F )ormore

Short circuit
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:

. If DTC P0110/24 (Intake Air Temp. Circuit Malfunction), P0115/22 (Water Temp. Circuit Malfunction),
P0120/41 (Throttle Position Sensor Circuit Malfunction), P1120/19 (Accelerator Pedal Position Sensor

Circuit Malfunction) are output simultaneously, E2 (Sensor Ground) may be open.

. Read freeze frame data using hand-held tester. Because freeze frame records the engine conditions
when the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was running or stopped, the engine warmed up or not, the air-fuel ratio lean or rich, etc. at the time

of the malfunction.
When using hand-held tester

1 Connect hand-held tester, and read value of intake air temperature.

PREPARATION:
(@) Connect the hand-held tester to the DLCS.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand-held tester main switch ON.

CHECK:
Read temperature value on the hand-held tester.
OK:

Same as actual intake air temperature
HINT:

« If there is open circuit, hand-held tester indicates -40° C (-40°F).
« Ifthereisshortcircuit,hand -heldtesterindicates 140 °C (284 °F) ormore.

NG>

-40°C (-40°F)...Gotostep 2.
140 C (284 F)ormore...Goto step4.

@

Check for intermittent problems
(See page DI-4).
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2 | Check for open in harness or engine ECU.

@ON

Intake Air
Temp. Sensor

BE6653
A00347

Engine ECU

A00348

@

PREPARATION:
(@) Disconnect the air flow meter connector.
(b) Connect the sensor wire harness terminals together.
(¢)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read temperature value on the hand-held tester.
OK:
Temperature value: 140°C (284°F) or more

OK Confirm good connection at sensor. If OK,
replace air flow meter.

»

Check for open in harness or engine ECU.

@ON

Intake Air
Temp. Sensor

Engine ECU

BE6653
FI7057
A05295

A04998

e ]

PREPARATION:
(@ Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Connect between terminals THA and E2 of the engine
ECU connector.
HINT:
Air flow meter connector is disconnected.
Before checking, do a visual and contact pressure check for the
engine ECU connector (See page IN-19).
CHECK:
Readtemperature value onthe hand
OK:
Temperature value: 140°C (284 °F) or more

—heldtester.

OK Open in harness between terminals E2 or THA,
repair or replace harness.

(See page IN-19)

Confirm good connection at engine ECU.
If OK, check and replace engine ECU.
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Temp. Sensor
1

O

2

BE6653
A00362

o——éfﬁ £

A00363

@

4 | Check for short in harness and engine ECU.
ON PREPARATION:
@ (@) Disconnect the air flow meter connector.
Intake Air Engine ECU| (b) Turn the ignition switch ON.

CHECK:
Read temperature value on the hand-held tester.
OK:

Temperature value: -40°C (-40°F)

Replace air flow meter.

ox )

Check for short in harness or engine ECU.

@ON

Intake Air Temp. Sensor

N

Engine ECU

I
Il
BE6653 y
FI7056
A02362

E8 Connector

A04999

@

PREPARATION:
(@ Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Disconnect the E8 connector of the engine ECU.
HINT:
Air flow meter connector is disconnected.
(¢)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read temperature value on the hand-held tester.
OK:
Temperature value: -40°C (-40°F)

Repair or replace harness or connector.

ox )

(See page IN-19).

Check and replace engine ECU

2UZ-FE ENGINE (RM630E)
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When not using hand-held tester

1 | Check voltage between terminals THA and E2 of engine ECU connector.

ON PREPARATION:
@ (@) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b)  Turn ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminals THA and E2 of engine

THA (+) E2(-)
\\

\
Al

¥

N . ] ECU connector.
e AN T OK:

1] T

RN EEEEE
L

Y N

Intake air temperature Voltage
BE6653
A05828 A0S835 20°C (68°F) 05-3.4V
60°C (140°F) 02-10V

OK Check for intermittent problems
(See page IN-19).

NG

2 [ Check intake air temp. sensor.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the air flow meter connector.
CHECK:

Ohmmeter TH Measure resistance between terminals THA and E2 of air flow
\ meter connector.
0O 2 oK:
/ Resistance is within acceptable zone on chart.
Intake air temperature Resistance
B04890 20°C (68°F) 2-3kQ
80°C (176°F) 0.2 - 0.4 kQ

NG> Replace air flow meter.
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3 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
intake air temp. sensor (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
~_—

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).

2UZ-FE ENGINE (RM630E)



